Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.105

Regents—Organization and conduct of business—Bylaws, rules and regulations—Open public meetings.

The board shall organize by electing from its membership a president and an executive committee, of which committee the president shall be ex officio chair. The board may adopt bylaws or rules and regulations for its own government and shall follow procedures for open public meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. The board shall provide time for public comment at each meeting. The board shall hold regular quarterly meetings, and during the interim between such meetings the executive committee may transact business for the whole board: PROVIDED, That the executive committee may call special meetings of the whole board when such action is deemed necessary.

[ 2012 c 228 s 1; 2011 c 336 s 717; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.105. Prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 240 s 4; RRS s 4555; prior: 1897 c 118 s 185. Formerly RCW 28.77.100. (ii) 1939 c 176 s 1, part; 1927 c 227 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 240 s 5, part; RRS s 4557, part. Formerly RCW 28.77.130, part.]